src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------

!Todo:
!need to implement obviation:
!   these are the facts as far as I understand them
!   animate nouns possessed by third persons must be obviative
!   obviation is consistent throughout a DP (obviative possessor has obviative possessum never proximate possessum)
!      this is somewhat redundant given the above generalization
!   inanimate nouns are not obligatorily obviative when possessed
!   it is unclear to me whether unspecified possessors trigger obviation
!   going to check with Rand
!indefinite pos cannot be inflected for number/obviation (correct?)

!moved to personprefixes.lexc
!LEXICON N_PREFIXES 
!1+:ni%< N_FIRST_PERSON_SET ;
!2+:gi%< N_SECOND_PERSON_SET ;
!3+:o%<  N_THIRD_PERSON_SET ;
!X+:i%<  N_X_PERSON_SET ; !will need to disallow indefinite possession on alienable
!        N_PRENOUNS ;
!
!!recommend specifying animacy near stem and as inflectional feature in plurals/obviatives
!!small redundancy, but spares memory and allows agreement checking if not inflected
!!memory not spared, because you might not want to accept the wrong gendered plural marker (though it does happen under certain discursive contexts)
!
!LEXICON N_FIRST_PERSON_SET 
!@P.Person.1@    N_PRENOUNS ;
!@P.Person.1@    N_EXTENDED_PREFIX ;
!
!LEXICON N_SECOND_PERSON_SET 
!@P.Person.2@    N_PRENOUNS ;
!@P.Person.2@    N_EXTENDED_PREFIX ;
!
!LEXICON N_THIRD_PERSON_SET 
!@P.Person.3@    N_PRENOUNS ;
!@P.Person.3@    N_EXTENDED_PREFIX ;
!
!LEXICON N_X_PERSON_SET 
!@P.Person.X@    N_PRENOUNS ;
!@P.Person.X@    N_EXTENDED_PREFIX ;
!
!LEXICON N_EXTENDED_PREFIX
!!need boundary to stop vowel coalescence across prefix-stem boundary
!0:da%*    N_EXTENDED_PREFIX_HYPHEN ; 
!0:di%*    N_EXTENDED_PREFIX_HYPHEN ; 
!0:doo%*   N_EXTENDED_PREFIX_HYPHEN ; 
!
!LEXICON N_EXTENDED_PREFIX_HYPHEN
!0:-     NOUNS ; 
!        NOUNS ; 
!
LEXICON N_PRENOUNS
PN/aabta+:aabita-    NOUNS    " 1 half " ; !Rand key:n72972558580n
PN/baapaagi+shki+:baapaagi-oshki-    NOUNS    " 1 brand spanking new" ; !Rand key:n73010342316n
PN/baate+:baate-    NOUNS    " 1 dried" ; !Rand key:n72975264705n
PN/bbashko+:babashko-    NOUNS    " 1 bald, hairless" ; !Rand key:n72976161091n
PN/bgoji+:bagVo1ji-    NOUNS    " 1 untame, wild" ; !Rand key:n72976843359n
PN/biinji+:biinji-    NOUNS    " 1 in, inside" ; !Rand key:n72976956595n
PN/dbik+:dibik-    NOUNS    " 1 night" ; !Rand key:n72994040520n
PN/de+:de-    NOUNS    " 1 fair (amount), moderate (amount)" ; !Rand key:n73000754739n
PN/gaadi+:gaadi-    NOUNS    " 1 spotted" ; !Rand key:n73016040578n
PN/gbe+:gabe-    NOUNS    " 1 all, whole [length of time], entire [length of time]" ; !Rand key:n73017881737n
PN/gchi+:gichi-    NOUNS    " 1 big, great, major" ; !Rand key:n73019338764n
PN/gchitwaa+:gichitwaa-    NOUNS    " 1 holy, revered, venerable, saint, saintly;  2 special; classy" ; !Rand key:n73019354833n
PN/gdagi+:gidagi-    NOUNS    " 1 freckled, mottled, spotted" ; !Rand key:n73019358803n
PN/gete+:gete-    NOUNS    " 1 old" ; !Rand key:n73020052657n
PN/ggashki+:gVi1gashki-    NOUNS    " 1 raw, uncooked" ; !Rand key:n73020284244n
PN/giimooji+:giimooji-    NOUNS    " 1 secret" ; !Rand key:n73023045613n
PN/giji+:Va1giji-    NOUNS    " 1 on, on top of" ; !Rand key:n73024358573n
PN/gnaaj+:gVo1naaj-    NOUNS    " 1 beautiful, good-looking, pretty, handsome" ; !Rand key:n73029029576n
PN/jiigi+:jiigi-    NOUNS    " 1 near" ; !Rand key:n72916440151n
PN/maapiitaa+:maapiitaa-    NOUNS    " 1 sometime during" ; !Rand key:n73032439911n
PN/mandaago+:mandaago-    NOUNS    " 1 beautiful, fair, handsome (usually, of a person)" ; !Rand key:n71429344252n
PN/megwe+:megwe-    NOUNS    " 1 among, in, in the middle of, in the midst of" ; !Rand key:n71429560148n
PN/mji+:maji-    NOUNS    " 1 bad, evil, mischievous, naughty" ; !Rand key:n71429741132n
PN/mkade+:makade-    NOUNS    " 1 black" ; !Rand key:n71429743236n
PN/mshi+:mishi-    NOUNS    " 1 big" ; !Rand key:n71430434048n
PN/msko+:misko-    NOUNS    " 1 red" ; !Rand key:n71430546577n
PN/myagi+:mayagi-    NOUNS    " 1 foreign, strange" ; !Rand key:n71430565470n
PN/naami+:anaami-    NOUNS    " 1 under" ; !Rand key:n71431052170n
PN/naano+:naano-    NOUNS    " 1 five" ; !Rand key:n71431061169n
PN/ngo+:ningo-    NOUNS    " 1 one" ; !Rand key:n71431647032n
PN/niiji+:iiji-    NOUNS    " 1 my fellow [so-and-so]" ; !Rand key:n73082447790n
PN/niizhoo+:niizhoo-    NOUNS    " 1 two" ; !Rand key:n71431845259n
PN/nso+:niso-    NOUNS    " 1 three" ; !Rand key:n71434558604n
PN/nwiiji+:wiiji-    NOUNS    " 1 my fellow [person]" ; !Rand key:n73071982720n
PN/shki+:oshki-    NOUNS    " 1 new;  2 young" ; !Rand key:n7303409726n
PN/waawye+:waawiye-    NOUNS    " 1 round" ; !Rand key:n73071851611n
PN/wenda+:wenda-    NOUNS    " 1 of no special kind, regular" ; !Rand key:n73034032619n
PN/yekwaa+:ayekwaa-    NOUNS    " 1 at the end" ; !Rand key:n73072240567n
PN/zaaw+:ozaaw-    NOUNS    " 1 brown, orange, yellow" ; !Rand key:n73072274211n
PN/zaaw+:zaaw-    NOUNS    " 1 brown, orange, yellow" ; !Rand key:n73072274211n
PN/aagwi+:aagawi-    NOUNS    " 1 behind, located behind" ; !Rand key:n20101278-46-15n
!PN/da+:oda-    NOUNS    " 1 his/her/their" ; !Rand key:n201132713-44-38n
!PN/doo+:o-    NOUNS    " 1 <i>the third person possessor marker</i>" ; !Rand key:n20113286-58-47n
PN/dso+:daso-    NOUNS    " 1 a certain number of, so many of" ; !Rand key:n201132819-26-23n
PN/endso+:endaso-    NOUNS    " 1 each, every" ; !Rand key:n201132916-43-33n
PN/ge+:ge-    NOUNS    " 1 on the one hand...on the other hand; however;  2 too, also" ; !Rand key:n201133016-48-3n
PN/baashji+:baashiji-    NOUNS    " 1 over, beyond (a specified object or location)" ; !Rand key:n20114915-37-53n
PN/bbooni+:bibooni-    NOUNS    " 1 winter [type], type used in winter, appropriate for winter, etc." ; !Rand key:n201611110-38-48n
PN/bganji+:baganji-    NOUNS    " 1 stupid, useless" ; !Rand key:n20161128-27-41n
            NOUNS ;

LEXICON N_CON_DIM   
+Con:%>e1ny    N_POS_THEME_GET ;
+Dim:%>e1ns    N_POS_THEME_GET ;
            N_POS_THEME_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_THEME_GET 
!go to N_POS_THEME only if you have person
!go to N_PEJ is legit alternative
@R.Person@  N_POS_THEME ;
            N_PEJ ;

LEXICON N_POS_THEME
!optionality of +Pos instantiated in N_POS_THEME_GET
!entrance requires a person flag, person flags are not forced to enter
+ThmPos:%>m N_PEJ ;

LEXICON N_PEJ 
+Pej:%>sh    N_POS_NUM_GET ;
            N_POS_NUM_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_GET 
@D.Person.X@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@  N_POS_NUM_2_1 ;
@D.Person.X@@D.Person.1@@R.Person@  N_POS_NUM_2_3 ;
@R.Person.3@            N_POS_NUM_3 ; 
                        N_MOOD_GET ;

!optionality of possessor number instantiated in GET
!entrance requires a person flag, person flags are not forced to enter

!should there be a nomenclature for the descendants of gateways?
!a specified order?
!it seems that one could have some indentation or bracketing to indicate when a sublexicon is under a gateway
!though within a lexicon, whitespace matters (?)

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_2_1
!2 prefix may be followed by 1pl suff=1.pl.inc
+1+Pl:%>naan2y1     N_MOOD_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_2_3
!3 prefix may be followed by 2pl suff=3.pl
+2+Pl:%>waa   N_MOOD_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_3
+3+4:%>niw2   N_MOOD_GET ;

!style/syntax note
!the following might be intuitive, but it is wrong
!it will match a "+" followed by a multicharacter "1Pl" ... which doesn't exist
!further, to make an output, you need to cross the fsas. 
!   [a|b] .x. [c|d] -> a:c, b:d
!   [a|b] .x. [c] -> a:c, b:c
!<"+"[1Pl|21]>:inaan   N_MOOD_GET ; !yaml currently excludes second person prefix, though this is used for first person inclusive
!style on regexes for features

!style note: terminal symbols only introduced when no further morphemes can possibly follow

LEXICON N_MOOD_GET 
+Prt:%>ban2i1  N_NUM_GET ;
@R.Animate.1@@D.Person.3@   NA_VOCPL ; !3-possessed animates may not be pl
!there might not be inanimate vocative plurals 
!if there are, they are -idig, not *-idin
@R.Animate.%0@   NA_VOCPL ;
            N_NUM_GET ;

LEXICON NA_VOCPL !Long feat name
+Voc+Pl:%>dig # ; !odawa specific variant (included because we are gearing towards Nish now)
!+Voc+Pl:%>dog # ; !general oji variant

LEXICON N_NUM_GET 
@R.Animate.1@@D.Person.3@   NA_NUM ; !3-possessed animates may not be pl 
@R.Animate.%0@   NI_NUM ;
+4:%>an1              # ;
+Loc:%>ng             # ;
                # ;
!intended: take one or none  of obv, loc, pl suffs, but no more
LEXICON NA_NUM 
+Pl:%>ag # ;

LEXICON NI_NUM 
+Pl:%>an1 # ;
